District of Columbia statutes.
26-1011

Special reporting requirements.

Within 15 days of the occurrence of any of the events listed below, a licensee shall file a written report with the Superintendent [Commissioner] describing the event and its expected impact on the licensee’s activities in the District:

(1)

The filing for bankruptcy or reorganization by the licensee;

(2)

The institution of revocation or suspension proceedings against the licensee by any state or governmental authority with regard to the licensees’ money transmission activities;

(3)

Any felony indictment of the licensee or any of its key officers or directors related to money transmission activities; or

(4)

Any felony conviction of the licensee or any of its key officers or directors related to money transmission activities.

History

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-140, § 12, 47 DCR 3431